public_html/app/tools/lang/morphology/dictionaries/vec.aff
FLAG num
SFX A èxer exerave/QS [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exeremo/K [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exeremoi/L [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exeren/K [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exerense/K [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exeresi/O [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exeresiu/P [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exeriai/J [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exeriei/J [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exerimo/K [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exerimoi/L [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exerion/K [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exerionse/K [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exerisen/K [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exerisense/K [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exerision/K [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exerisionse/K [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exerisié/O [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exerisiéu/P [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exerison/K [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exerisonse/K [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exerié/O [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exeriéu/P [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exeron/K [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exeronse/K [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exerà/IMQ [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exeràe/Q [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exerài/J [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exerè/I [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exerèi/J [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exeré/O [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exerésimo/K [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exerésimoi/L [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exeréu/P [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exerí/O [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exería/IMQ [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exeríatu/N [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exeríe/IQ [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exeríelo/R [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exeríu/P [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exerò/I [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exeròi/J [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exese/H [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exesi [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exesta/H [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exeste/H [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exesti/H [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exesto/H [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exeva/IOQ [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exevai/J [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exevau/P [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exeve/I [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exevei/J [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exevi/MO [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exevo/I [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exevoi/J [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer eximo/K [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer eximoi/L [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exion/K [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exione/K [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exionse/K [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exisen/K [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exisene/K [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exisense/K [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exision/K [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exisione/K [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exisionse/K [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exison/K [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exisone/K [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exisonse/K [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exiven/K [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exivense/K [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exivion/K [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exivionse/K [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exivié/O [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exiviéu/P [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exivon/K [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exivonse/K [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exié/O [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exiéu/P [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exon/K [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exone/K [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exonse/K [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exua/H [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exuda/H [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exude/H [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exudi/H [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exudo/H [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exue/H [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exui/H [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exuo/H [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exé/GO [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exéa/IOQ [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exée/I [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exéelo/R [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exéi/MO [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exéimo/K [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exéimoi/L [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exéitu/N [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exéo/I [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exésimo [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exéu/P [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exévelo/R [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exévimo/K [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exévimoi/L [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exévitu/N [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exí/GO [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exíu/P [rt]èxer
SFX A èxer exú [rt]èxer
SFX A èñer eñeai/J [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñeau/P [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñede [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñeei/J [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñege [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñemo/K [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñemoi/L [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñen/K [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñendo/EG [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñene/K [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñense/K [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñente [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñeoi/J [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñeralo/R [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñeratu/N [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñerave/QS [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñeremo/K [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñeremoi/L [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñeren/K [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñerense/K [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñeresi/O [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñeresiu/P [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñeriai/J [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñeriei/J [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñerimo/K [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñerimoi/L [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñerion/K [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñerionse/K [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñerisen/K [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñerisense/K [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñerision/K [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñerisionse/K [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñerisié/O [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñerisiéu/P [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñerison/K [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñerisonse/K [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñerié/O [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñeriéu/P [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñeron/K [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñeronse/K [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñerà/IMQ [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñeràe/Q [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñerài/J [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñerè/I [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñerèi/J [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñeré/O [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñerésimo/K [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñerésimoi/L [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñeréu/P [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñerí/O [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñería/IMQ [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñeríatu/N [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñeríe/IQ [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñeríelo/R [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñeríu/P [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñerò/I [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñeròi/J [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñese/H [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñesi [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñesta/H [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñeste/H [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñesti/H [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñesto/H [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñeva/IOQ [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñevai/J [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñevau/P [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñeve/I [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñevei/J [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñevi/MO [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñevo/I [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñevoi/J [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñimo/K [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñimoi/L [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñisen/K [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñisene/K [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñisense/K [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñision/K [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñisione/K [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñisionse/K [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñison/K [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñisone/K [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñisonse/K [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñiven/K [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñivense/K [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñivion/K [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñivionse/K [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñivié/O [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñiviéu/P [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñivon/K [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñivonse/K [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñié/O [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñiéu/P [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñon/K [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñone/K [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñonse/K [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñua/H [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñuda/H [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñude/H [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñudi/H [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñudo/H [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñue/H [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñui/H [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñuo/H [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñé/GO [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñéa/IOQ [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñée/I [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñéelo/R [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñéi/MO [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñéimo/K [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñéimoi/L [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñéitu/N [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñéo/I [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñésimo [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñéu/P [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñévelo/R [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñévimo/K [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñévimoi/L [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñévitu/N [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñí/GO [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñíu/P [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer eñú [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer ièn/EGQ [ctv]èñer
SFX A èñer iènlo/R [ctv]èñer
SFX A èđer eđeai/J [il]èđer
SFX A èđer eđeau/P [il]èđer
SFX A èđer eđede [il]èđer
SFX A èđer eđeei/J [il]èđer
SFX A èđer eđege [il]èđer
SFX A èđer eđemo/K [il]èđer
SFX A èđer eđemoi/L [il]èđer
SFX A èđer eđen/K [il]èđer
SFX A èđer eđendo/EG [il]èđer
SFX A èđer eđene/K [il]èđer
SFX A èđer eđense/K [il]èđer
SFX A èđer eđente [il]èđer
SFX A èđer eđeoi/J [il]èđer
SFX A èđer eđeralo/R [il]èđer
SFX A èđer eđeratu/N [il]èđer
SFX A èđer eđerave/QS [il]èđer
SFX A èđer eđeremo/K [il]èđer
SFX A èđer eđeremoi/L [il]èđer
SFX A èđer eđeren/K [il]èđer
SFX A èđer eđerense/K [il]èđer
SFX A èđer eđeresi/O [il]èđer
SFX A èđer eđeresiu/P [il]èđer
SFX A èđer eđeriai/J [il]èđer
SFX A èđer eđeriei/J [il]èđer
SFX A èđer eđerimo/K [il]èđer
SFX A èđer eđerimoi/L [il]èđer
SFX A èđer eđerion/K [il]èđer
SFX A èđer eđerionse/K [il]èđer
SFX A èđer eđerisen/K [il]èđer
SFX A èđer eđerisense/K [il]èđer
SFX A èđer eđerision/K [il]èđer
SFX A èđer eđerisionse/K [il]èđer
SFX A èđer eđerisié/O [il]èđer
SFX A èđer eđerisiéu/P [il]èđer
SFX A èđer eđerison/K [il]èđer
SFX A èđer eđerisonse/K [il]èđer
