public_html/app/tools/lang/morphology/dictionaries/vec.dic
dexabitar/A
alastar/A
inalborar/A
realŧar/A
andar/A
ankorar/A
àrder/A
inarkar/A
arxarar/A
atergar/A
augurar/A
autoriđar/A
dexbafarar/A
balar/A
inbalordir/A
bandir/A
xbaraɉar/A
barkiđar/A
bàter/A
inbaukir/A
xbefeɉar/A
inberlar/A
xbevaŧar/A
xbigatar/A
dexbirar/A
xbixegar/A
xboɉentar/A
inbolsir/A
inbonbegar/A
xborfar/A
inbotonar/A
inbragar/A
brandir/A
xbrenar/A
xbrodolar/A
inbronbar/A
brustolar/A
burlar/A
buxerar/A
scaređar/A
aparcèñer/A
océñer/A
scinkar/A
dexdir/A
davañar/A
xderenar/A
diladiar/A
indoar/A
domiŧiliar/A
dormir/A
indreŧar/A
sedúxer/A
đogolar/A
đurar/A
ekuivokar/A
espèler/A
exentar/A
sodisfar/A
falar/A
fameliariđar/A
desfasar/A
favoriđar/A
sakrifegar/A
sfénder/A
desferenŧiar/A
enfiar/A
desfiapir/A
fifar/A
filtrar/A
fiorir/A
fitar/A
sfodrar/A
folar/A
forbir/A
informigar/A
infradelar/A
infrànđer/A
fraudar/A
frexar/A
frondeđar/A
transfugar/A
furegar/A
gabar/A
xgalonar/A
inganŧar/A
xgardufar/A
ingatolar/A
ingloriar/A
xgoñar/A
retrogradir/A
grandenar/A
gratar/A
gređar/A
grevar/A
ingriŧolir/A
grostinar/A
guadañar/A
xguinŧar/A
idratar/A
reinestar/A
inpiokar/A
interiŧir/A
inxuriar/A
joŧar/A
inɉemarar/A
ɉugular/A
deskaenar/A
reskaldar/A
skalmanar/A
skalumar/A
skanbiar/A
skanpanar/A
kañar/A
rekapitar/A
karatelar/A
skarnir/A
skartar/A
skasegar/A
inkatejar/A
inkaŧir/A
kavalkar/A
kietar/A
skofonar/A
kokonar/A
skolorir/A
skomenŧiar/A
konéter/A
konpanadegar/A
kontaminar/A
akonŧar/A
dekórer/A
kordar/A
inkornar/A
inkosar/A
kovar/A
strakréder/A
skrikar/A
inkrostar/A
kuadrar/A
skuercar/A
inkuirar/A
kumular/A
skurioxar/A
lagar/A
lañar/A
relasar/A
inlear/A
deleguar/A
arlevar/A
ekuilibrar/A
xlimegar/A
litigar/A
xlonbar/A
prelúder/A
lúxer/A
magañar/A
maliŧiar/A
manedar/A
mantekar/A
maraveɉar/A
xmartelar/A
maskarar/A
inmatir/A
inmaxarar/A
intermeđar/A
remenar/A
menxonar/A
méter/A
preméter/A
emigrar/A
remirar/A
moɉar/A
xmolacar/A
dexmontar/A
amorbar/A
morsar/A
demostrar/A
mucar/A
mular/A
xmusar/A
muxolar/A
naturaliđar/A
negriđar/A
ninegar/A
denonŧiar/A
nuvolar/A
xñokolar/A
ojar/A
olir/A
onbrar/A
ontolar/A
subordenar/A
abortir/A
oxar/A
padroneđar/A
despaketar/A
spaliŧar/A
inpaludar/A
spantađar/A
deskonparir/A
despaređar/A
skonpartir/A
strapasar/A
pasturar/A
inpatriarkar/A
inpaverar/A
despegolar/A
inpelukar/A
dispénder/A
despenolar/A
peotar/A
sperlongar/A
pestolar/A
spetolar/A
peverar/A
sopiantar/A
pieđar/A
pilar/A
spionbar/A
pisar/A
inpiŧar/A
replegar/A
inpolpar/A
póner/A
rekonpóner/A
apontar/A
spontiđar/A
soporar/A
desposesar/A
spotacar/A
precixar/A
represtinar/A
inpriar/A
prontar/A
spuleđar/A
deputar/A
inrabir/A
rakolar/A
ranciñar/A
ranŧiñar/A
raŧionar/A
dexredar/A
rénder/A
rexegar/A
riñar/A
robakiar/A
roeđar/A
romañir/A
dexroñar/A
roveɉar/A
rugolar/A
ruspar/A
sagomar/A
deskonsakrar/A
salmistrar/A
insangonar/A
desapunir/A
saxar/A
scopađar/A
strasekolar/A
perseguir/A
asegurar/A
inselvadigir/A
sentar/A
konseñar/A
servir/A
setar/A
siamar/A
simiotar/A
siringar/A
skalar/A
skarar/A
skarsexar/A
skicar/A
skoltar/A
skriŧar/A
skuarŧar/A
solar/A
solfiđar/A
insonar/A
sordir/A
spanar/A
spaŧar/A
spergoŧar/A
ispeŧionar/A
spiocar/A
despojar/A
sprotonar/A
stabilir/A
instalar/A
konstatar/A
stenografar/A
destínguer/A
stivar/A
instornir/A
strangolar/A
strigar/A
kostruir/A
stuar/A
stupidir/A
sufitar/A
superbir/A
sutilar/A
intajar/A
stakar/A
intanbarar/A
taraŧar/A
tarmar/A
tavanar/A
intecar/A
proténder/A
tenperar/A
ostentar/A
asteñir/A
apartèñer/A
detéñer/A
intepidir/A
terŧariolar/A
tetar/A
retirar/A
tokar/A
tonbolar/A
tontonar/A
tornar/A
retòrđer/A
atràer/A
trabatar/A
tranguɉar/A
strasinar/A
straviar/A
stremir/A
stridar/A
intristir/A
troñar/A
tufar/A
ŧakar/A
ŧavarɉar/A
ŧementar/A
inŧercelar/A
skonŧertar/A
ŧifolar/A
inŧinganar/A
ŧitir/A
inŧukar/A
ultimar/A
abuxar/A
invagir/A
vangar/A
varar/A
invecar/A
dexvegrar/A
invelenar/A
deventar/A
arveñir/A
rinveñir/A
revèñer/A
inverđelar/A
verniđar/A
vèrter/A
investir/A
inviar/A
invinar/A
inviscar/A
vivatar/A
xvogaŧar/A
xvolaŧar/A
deskonvòlxer/A
xvòlxer/A
xàŧer/A
xbitar/A
inxeloxir/A
xetar/A
xlainar/A
xmorgolar/A
sprexudegar/A
